hr-HR: Vrsta amortizera za bicikl: Prednja suspenzija (hardtail); Puna suspenzija (full suspension); Samo stražnja suspenzija; Bez suspenzije (rigid); Ostalo
fi: Polkupyörän jousitustyypi: Etujousitettu (hardtail); Täysjousitettu; Vain takajousitus; Jäykkä; Muu
zh-TW: 自行車避震類型: 前避震 (單避震); 全避震; 僅後避震; 硬叉; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta vzmetenja kolesa: Sprednje vzmetenje (hardtail); Polno vzmetenje; Samo zadnje vzmetenje; Togo; Drugo
pl: Typ zawieszenia roweru: Tylko przedni amortyzator (hardtail); Pełne zawieszenie (full suspension); Tylko tylny amortyzator; Sztywny; Inne
ja: 自転車用サスペンションタイプ: フロントサスペンション (ハードテイル); フルサスペンション; リアサスペンションのみ; リジッド; その他
nb: Type sykkelfjæring: Dempegaffel foran (hardtail); Fulldemper; Kun bakdemper; Stiv; Annet
cs: Typ odpružení jízdního kola: Přední odpružení (hardtail); Celoodpružené; Pouze zadní odpružení; Pevné; Jiné
zh-CN: 自行车悬架类型: 前悬挂（硬尾）; 全避震; 仅后悬挂; 硬叉; 其他
fr: Type de suspension de vélo: Suspension avant (semi-rigide); Tout suspendu; Suspension arrière uniquement; Rigide; Autre
lt-LT: Dviračių pakabos tipas: Priekinė amortizacija („hardtail“); Pilna amortizacija; Tik galinė amortizacija; Be amortizacijos (kieta šakė); Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de suspensão de bicicleta: Suspensão dianteira (hardtail); Suspensão total; Apenas suspensão traseira; Rígida; Outro
en: Bicycle suspension type: Front suspension (hardtail); Full suspension; Rear suspension only; Rigid; Other
pt-PT: Tipo de suspensão da bicicleta: Suspensão dianteira (hardtail); Suspensão total; Apenas suspensão traseira; Rígida; Outros
da: Affjedringstype i cykel: Affjedring foran (hardtail); Fuld affjedring; Kun affjedring bagpå; Stiv; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul suspensiei de bicicletă: Suspensie față (hardtail); Suspensie completă (full suspension); Doar suspensie spate; Rigid; Altele
sv: Typ av cykelgafflar: Framdämpad (hardtail); Heldämpad; Endast bakdämpad; Stel; Övrigt
nl: Veersysteem fiets: Voorvering (hardtail); Volledige vering; Alleen achtervering; Star; Anders
th: ประเภทระบบกันสะเทือนของจักรยาน: โช้คหน้า (ฮาร์ดเทล); ฟูลซัสเพนชัน; โช้คหลังเท่านั้น; ตะเกียบแข็ง; อื่นๆ
ko: 자전거 서스펜션 유형: 프런트 서스펜션(하드테일); 풀 서스펜션; 리어 서스펜션 전용; 리지드; 기타
de: Fahrradfederungstyp: Vorderradfederung (Hardtail); Vollfederung; Nur Hinterradfederung; Starr; Sonstige
ru: Тип велосипедной подвески: С передним амортизатором (хардтейл); Двухподвес; Только задний амортизатор; Жесткая (ригид); Другое
sk-SK: Typ odpruženia bicykla: Predné odpruženie (hardtail); Celoodpružené; Iba zadné odpruženie; Pevné; Iné
vi: Loại giảm xóc xe đạp: Phuộc trước (hardtail); Phuộc đôi; Chỉ phuộc sau; Không phuộc; Khác
it: Tipo di sospensione della bicicletta: Sospensione anteriore (hardtail); Biammortizzata; Solo sospensione posteriore; Rigida; Altro
el: Τύπος ανάρτησης ποδηλάτου: Εμπρόσθια ανάρτηση (hardtail); Πλήρης ανάρτηση (full suspension); Μόνο πίσω ανάρτηση; Χωρίς ανάρτηση (rigid); Άλλο
tr: Bisiklet süspansiyon türü: Ön süspansiyon (hardtail); Çift süspansiyon; Sadece arka süspansiyon; Sabit; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип окачване на велосипед: Предно окачване (твърда рамка); Пълно окачване; Само задно окачване; Твърдо (без окачване); Други
hu: Kerékpár felfüggesztés típusa: Első teleszkópos (hardtail); Összteleszkópos; Csak hátsó teleszkópos; Merev; Egyéb
es: Tipo de suspensión de bicicleta: Suspensión delantera (rígida); Doble suspensión; Solo suspensión trasera; Rígida; Otro